Maryland, session 2025, HB0898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–809.
(c) (1) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) of this section, the tax imposed
by this section is [6 percent]:
(I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, 6%
of the fair market value of the vehicle; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0898*

HOUSE BILL 898
(II) IN THE CASE OF A RENTAL VEHICLE, 3.5% OF THE FAIR
MARKET VALUE OF THE VEHICLE.
(2) If the vehicle formerly was a vehicle exempt from the tax imposed by
this section, the tax shall be reduced by any amount previously paid by the present owner
as a sales and use tax on the vehicle under Title 11 of the Tax – General Article.
(3) (i) If the vehicle was formerly titled and registered in another state
and the present owner has paid a sales or excise tax to that state at a rate less than that
imposed by this State, then the tax imposed shall apply but at a rate measured by the
difference only between the tax rate paid to the other state and the tax rate imposed by this
section, if the present owner has not been a Maryland resident for more than 60 days.
(ii) If the vehicle was formerly titled and registered in another state
and the present owner requests to transfer the vehicle in accordance with § 13–810(c)(1) of
this subtitle, the Administration shall change or correct the names contained in the
certificate of title:
1. At the time the excise tax that is credited or imposed
under this section is paid and a new title is issued; and
2. Without issuing multiple certificates of title or charging
additional fees.
(iii) Except as provided in subsection (b)(2) of this section, the
minimum tax imposed under this section shall be $100.
13–810.
(a) On issuance in this State of an original or subsequent certificate of title for a
vehicle, the vehicle is exempt from the excise tax imposed by this part, if it is:
(24) A vehicle acquired by a religious, charitable, or volunteer organization
exempt from taxation under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, the Department of
Human Services, or a local department of social services for the purpose of transferring the
vehicle to a Family Investment Program recipient or an individual certified by the
Department of Human Services or a local department of social services as eligible for the
transfer; OR
[(25) A rental vehicle; or]
[(26)] (25) A vehicle that is transferred to a trust or from a trust to one or
more beneficiaries in accordance with § 14.5–1001 of the Estates and Trusts Article.

HOUSE BILL 898 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.